test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_morces_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - morčes: # MLO, ok
    morčes+N+Sg+Nom: morčes
    morčes+N+Sg+Gen: morččá
    morčes+N+Sg+Acc: morččá
    morčes+N+Sg+Ill: morččás
    morčes+N+Sg+Loc: morččást
    morčes+N+Sg+Com: morččáin
    morčes+N+Sg+Abe: morčáttáá
    morčes+N+Ess: morčesin
    morčes+N+Par: morčesid
    morčes+N+Pl+Nom: morččáh
    morčes+N+Pl+Gen: morččái
    morčes+N+Pl+Acc: morččáid
    morčes+N+Pl+Ill: morččáid
    morčes+N+Pl+Loc: morččáin
    morčes+N+Pl+Com: [morčáiguin, morčáigijn]
    morčes+N+Pl+Abe: morčáittáá

  Noun - niskes: # MLO, ok
    niskes+N+Sg+Nom: niskes
    niskes+N+Sg+Gen: niská
    niskes+N+Sg+Acc: niská
    niskes+N+Sg+Ill: niskás
    niskes+N+Sg+Loc: niskást
    niskes+N+Sg+Com: niskáin
    niskes+N+Sg+Abe: niskáttáá
    niskes+N+Ess: niskesin
    niskes+N+Par: niskesid
    niskes+N+Pl+Nom: niskáh
    niskes+N+Pl+Gen: niskái
    niskes+N+Pl+Acc: niskáid
    niskes+N+Pl+Ill: niskáid
    niskes+N+Pl+Loc: niskáin
    niskes+N+Pl+Com: [niskáiguin, niskáigijn]
    niskes+N+Pl+Abe: niskáittáá

  Noun - peles: # MLO, ok
    peles+N+Sg+Nom: peles
    peles+N+Sg+Gen: [piällás, piällá]
    peles+N+Sg+Acc: [piällás, piällá]
    peles+N+Sg+Ill: [piälásân, piällás]
    peles+N+Sg+Loc: [piälásist, piällást]
    peles+N+Sg+Com: [piälásáin, piälláin]
    peles+N+Sg+Abe: [piällásttáá, piälláttáá]
    peles+N+Ess: pelesin
    peles+N+Par: pelesid
    peles+N+Pl+Nom: [piäláseh, piälláh]
    peles+N+Pl+Gen: [piälásij, piällái]
    peles+N+Pl+Acc: [piälásijd, piälláid]
    peles+N+Pl+Ill: [piälásáid, piälláid]
    peles+N+Pl+Loc: [piälásijn, piälláin]
    peles+N+Pl+Com: [piälásijguin, piälásijgijn, piälláiguin, piälláigijn]
    peles+N+Pl+Abe: [piälásijttáá, piälláittáá]
    
